Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 2. Powers, Duties, and Liabilities.

§ 64.2-2019.
Duties and powers of guardian.

A guardian stands in a fiduciary relationship to the incapacitated person for whom he was appointed guardian and may be held personally liable for a breach of any fiduciary duty to the incapacitated person. A guardian shall not be liable for the acts of the incapacitated person unless the guardian is personally negligent. A guardian shall not be required to expend personal funds on behalf of the incapacitated person.

A guardian’s duties and authority shall not extend to decisions addressed in a valid advance directive or durable power of attorney previously executed by the incapacitated person. A guardian may seek court authorization to revoke, suspend, or otherwise modify a durable power of attorney, as provided by the Uniform Power of Attorney Act (§

64.2-1600

et seq.). Notwithstanding the provisions of the Health Care Decisions Act (§

54.1-2981

et seq.) and in accordance with the procedures of §

64.2-2012

, a guardian may seek court authorization to modify the designation of an agent under an advance directive, but the modification shall not in any way affect the incapacitated person’s directives concerning the provision or refusal of specific medical treatments or procedures.

A guardian shall maintain sufficient contact with the incapacitated person to know of his capabilities, limitations, needs, and opportunities. The guardian shall visit the incapacitated person as often as necessary.

A guardian shall be required to seek prior court authorization to change the incapacitated person’s residence to another state, to terminate or consent to a termination of the person’s parental rights, or to initiate a change in the person’s marital status.

A guardian shall, to the extent feasible, encourage the incapacitated person to participate in decisions, to act on his own behalf, and to develop or regain the capacity to manage personal affairs. A guardian, in making decisions, shall consider the expressed desires and personal values of the incapacitated person to the extent known and shall otherwise act in the incapacitated person’s best interest and exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence. A guardian shall not unreasonably restrict an incapacitated person’s ability to communicate with, visit, or interact with other persons with whom the incapacitated person has an established relationship.

A guardian shall have authority to make arrangements for the funeral and disposition of remains, including cremation, interment, entombment, memorialization, inurnment, or scattering of the cremains, or some combination thereof, if the guardian is not aware of any person that has been otherwise designated to make such arrangements as set forth in §

54.1-2825

. A guardian shall have authority to make arrangements for the funeral and disposition of remains after the death of an incapacitated person if, after the guardian has made a good faith effort to locate the next of kin of the incapacitated person to determine if the next of kin wishes to make such arrangements, the next of kin does not wish to make the arrangements or the next of kin cannot be located. Good faith effort shall include contacting the next of kin identified in the petition for appointment of a guardian. The funeral service licensee, funeral service establishment, registered crematory, cemetery, cemetery operator, or guardian shall be immune from civil liability for any act, decision, or omission resulting from acceptance of any dead body for burial, cremation, or other disposition when the provisions of this section are met, unless such acts, decisions, or omissions resulted from bad faith or malicious intent.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-137.1; 2005, c. 716, §
37.2-1020; 2010, cc. 455, 632; 2012, cc. 463, 614; 2016, cc. 404, 405.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 463 amended former § 37.2-1020, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 4, the 2012 amendment by Acts 2012, c. 463 has been given effect in this section by adding subsection F.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 404 and 405 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection E.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Divorce of incapacitated person. —

Husband could not proceed with a divorce case by using the husband’s sibling as an agent under a general power of attorney grantedbecause a general power of attorney did not permit an agent to maintain a divorce action for an incapacitated person. The circuit court further found that the husband had to first obtain a guardian to maintain the divorce. Heu v. Kim, 107 Va. Cir. 100, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 7 (Fairfax County Jan. 8, 2021).

§ 64.2-2020.
Annual reports by guardians.

A guardian shall file an annual report in compliance with the filing deadlines in §

64.2-1305

with the local department of social services for the jurisdiction where the incapacitated person then resides. The annual report shall be on a form prepared by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and shall be accompanied by a filing fee of $5. To the extent practicable, the annual report shall be formatted in a manner to encourage standardized and detailed responses from guardians. The local department shall retain the fee in the jurisdiction where the fee is collected for use in the provision of services to adults in need of protection. Within 60 days of receipt of the annual report, the local department shall file a copy of the annual report with the clerk of the circuit court that appointed the guardian, to be placed with the court papers pertaining to the guardianship case. Twice each year the local department shall file with the clerk of the circuit court a list of all guardians who are more than 90 days delinquent in filing an annual report as required by this section. If the guardian is also a conservator, a settlement of accounts shall also be filed with the commissioner of accounts as provided in §

64.2-1305

.

The annual report to the local department of social services shall include:

A description of the current mental, physical, and social condition of the incapacitated person, including any change in diagnosis or assessment of any such condition of such incapacitated person by any medical provider since the last report;

A description of the incapacitated person’s living arrangements during the reported period, including a specific assessment of the adequacy of such living arrangement;

The medical, educational, vocational, social, recreational, and any other professional services and activities provided to the incapacitated person and the guardian’s opinion as to the adequacy of the incapacitated person’s care. The information required by this subdivision shall include (i) the specific names of the medical providers that have treated the incapacitated person and a description of the frequency or number of times the incapacitated person was seen by such providers; (ii) the date and location of and reason for any hospitalization of such incapacitated person; and (iii) a description of the educational, vocational, social, and recreational activities in which such incapacitated person participated;

A statement of whether the guardian agrees with the current treatment or habilitation plan;

A statement of whether the incapacitated person has been an alleged victim in a report of abuse, neglect, or exploitation made pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

et seq.) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2, to the extent known, and whether there are any other indications of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of such incapacitated person;

A recommendation as to the need for continued guardianship and any recommended changes in the scope of the guardianship;

The name of any persons whose access to communicate, visit, or interact with the incapacitated person has been restricted and the reasons for such restriction;

A self-assessment by the guardian as to whether he feels he is able to continue to carry out the powers and duties imposed upon him by §

64.2-2019

and as specified in the court’s order of appointment pursuant to §

64.2-2009

;

Unless the incapacitated person resides with the guardian, a statement of the frequency and nature of any (i) in-person visits from the guardian with the incapacitated person over the course of the previous year and (ii) visits over the course of the previous year from a designee who is directly supervised or contracted by the guardian, including the name of the designee performing such visit. If any visit described in this section is made virtually, the guardian shall include such information in the annual report;

If no visit is made within a six-month period, the guardian shall describe any challenges or limitations in completing such visit;

A general description of the activities taken on by the guardian for the benefit of the incapacitated person during the past year;

Any other information deemed necessary by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia or the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services to understand the condition, treatment, and well-being of the incapacitated person;

Any other information useful in the opinion of the guardian; and

The compensation requested and the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the guardian.

The guardian shall certify by signing under oath that the information contained in the annual report is true and correct to the best of his knowledge. If a guardian makes a false entry or statement in the annual report, he shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500. Such penalty shall be collected by the attorney for the Commonwealth or the county or city attorney, and the proceeds shall be deposited into the general fund.

If the local department of social services files notice that the annual report has not been timely filed in accordance with subsection A with the clerk of the circuit court, the court may issue a summons or rule to show cause why the guardian has failed to file such annual report.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-137.2; 1998, c. 582; 2000, c. 198; 2003, c. 527; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1021; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 133; 2019, c. 443; 2020, cc. 190, 372; 2022, c. 381.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 133 combined the former first and second sentences of subsection A into one sentence by deleting “in which he was appointed. It shall be the duty of that local department to forward the report to the local department of the jurisdiction” following “for the jurisdiction” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 443, in subsections A and B, inserted “annual” preceding “report” four times; and in subdivisions B 2 through 4, inserted “incapacitated” preceding both “person” and “person’s” four times; and added subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 190 and 372 are identical, and in the last paragraph in subsection B, inserted “by signing under oath” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 381 added the third sentence in subsection A; added “including any change in diagnosis or assessment of any such condition of such incapacitated person by any medical provider since the last report” in subdivision B 1 at the end; added “including a specific assessment of the adequacy of such living arrangement” in subdivision B 2 at the end; in subdivision B 3, inserted “social, recreational,” “any,” and “and activities” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; deleted former subdivision B 4, which read: “A statement of the frequency and nature of the guardian’s visits with and activities on behalf of the incapacitated person”; added current subdivisions B 5 and 7; added subdivisions B 8 through 13; deleted “and any other information useful in the opinion of the guardian” in current subdivision 6 at the end; redesignated accordingly; and made stylistic changes.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-703 Petition for Appointment of Guardian and Conservator, et seq.; No. 15-482 Annual Report of Guardian for an Incapacitated Person.

§ 64.2-2021.
General duties and liabilities of conservator.

At all times the conservator shall exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence and shall act in the best interest of the incapacitated person. To the extent known to him, a conservator shall consider the expressed desires and personal values of the incapacitated person.

Subject to any conditions or limitations set forth in the conservatorship order, the conservator shall take care of and preserve the estate of the incapacitated person and manage it to the best advantage. The conservator shall apply the income from the estate, or so much as may be necessary, to the payment of the debts of the incapacitated person, including payment of reasonable compensation to himself and to any guardian appointed, and to the maintenance of the person and of his legal dependents, if any, and, to the extent that the income is not sufficient, he shall so apply the corpus of the estate.

A conservator shall, to the extent feasible, encourage the incapacitated person to participate in decisions, to act on his own behalf, and to develop or regain the capacity to manage the estate and his financial affairs. A conservator also shall consider the size of the estate, the probable duration of the conservatorship, the incapacitated person’s accustomed manner of living, other resources known to the conservator to be available, and the recommendations of the guardian.

A conservator stands in a fiduciary relationship to the incapacitated person for whom he was appointed conservator and may be held personally liable for a breach of any fiduciary duty. Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a conservator is personally liable on a contract entered into in a fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the estate, unless he reveals the representative capacity and identifies the estate in the contract. Claims based upon contracts entered into by a conservator in a fiduciary capacity, obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate, or torts committed in the course of administration of the estate may be asserted against the estate by proceeding against the conservator in a fiduciary capacity, whether or not the conservator is personally liable therefor. A successor conservator is not personally liable for the contracts or actions of a predecessor.

A conservator shall comply with and be subject to the requirements imposed upon fiduciaries generally under Part A (§

64.2-1200

et seq.) of this subtitle, specifically including the duty to account set forth in §

64.2-1305

.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-137.3; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1022; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2022.
Management powers and duties of conservator.

A conservator, in managing the estate, shall have the powers set forth in §

64.2-105

as of the date the conservator acts as well as the following powers, which may be exercised without prior court authorization except as otherwise specifically provided in the court’s order of appointment:

To ratify or reject a contract entered into by an incapacitated person;

To pay any sum distributable for the benefit of the incapacitated person or for the benefit of a legal dependent by paying the sum directly to the distributee, to the provider of goods and services, to any individual or facility that is responsible for or has assumed responsibility for care and custody, or to a distributee’s custodian under a Uniform Gifts or Transfers to Minors Act of any applicable jurisdiction or by paying the sum to the guardian of the incapacitated person or, in the case of a dependent, to the dependent’s guardian or conservator;

To maintain life, health, casualty, and liability insurance for the benefit of the incapacitated person or his legal dependents;

To manage the estate following the termination of the conservatorship until its delivery to the incapacitated person or successors in interest;

To execute and deliver all instruments and to take all other actions that will serve in the best interests of the incapacitated person;

To initiate a proceeding (i) to revoke a power of attorney under the provisions of the Uniform Power of Attorney Act (§

64.2-1600

et seq.), (ii) to make an augmented estate election under §

64.2-302

or

64.2-308.13

, as applicable, or (iii) to make an election to take a family allowance, exempt property, or a homestead allowance under §

64.2-313

; and

To borrow money for periods of time and upon terms and conditions for rates, maturities, renewals, and security that to the conservator shall seem advisable, including the power to borrow from the conservator, if the conservator is a bank, for any purpose; to mortgage or pledge the portion of the incapacitated person’s estate that may be required to secure the loan or loans; and, as maker or endorser, to renew existing loans.

The court may impose requirements to be satisfied by the conservator prior to the conveyance of any interest in real estate, including (i) increasing the amount of the conservator’s bond, (ii) securing an appraisal of the real estate or interest, (iii) giving notice to interested parties as the court deems proper, (iv) consulting by the conservator with the commissioner of accounts and, if one has been appointed, with the guardian, and (v) requiring the use of a common source information company, as defined in §

54.1-2130

, when listing the property. If the court imposes any such requirements, the conservator shall make a report of his compliance with each requirement, to be filed with the commissioner of accounts. Promptly following receipt of the conservator’s report, the commissioner of accounts shall file a report with the court indicating whether the requirements imposed have been met and whether the sale is otherwise consistent with the conservator’s duties. The conveyance shall not be closed until a report by the commissioner of accounts is filed with the court and confirmed as provided in §§

64.2-1212

,

64.2-1213

, and

64.2-1214

.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-137.4; 2004, cc. 652, 756; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1023; 2007, c. 694; 2010, cc. 455, 632; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 523; 2016, cc. 187, 269.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 523 added clause (iii) in subdivision A 6, and made a related change.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 187 and 269 are identical, and inserted “or

64.2-308.13

, as applicable,” in subdivision A 6.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 1-106 Style and Commencement of Action by Conservator of Incapacitated Person; No. 5-1004 Complaint to Set Aside Deed Because of Mental Incapacity; No. 6-703 Petition for Appointment of Guardian and Conservator, et seq.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Revocation of beneficiary. —

Revocation of a wife as the designated beneficiary of a life insurance policy was upheld because the evidence a daughter submitted about her father’s capacity and wish to change his beneficiary was not controverted; that the father preferred to confer a benefit on his daughter, who took him in and cared for him, rather than on a wife of just a few years, who was removed as guardian for malfeasance and who had no contact with him for years, was supported by a preponderance of the evidence. Minn. Life Ins. Co. v. Brown, 97 Va. Cir. 68, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 204 (Norfolk 2012).

If an incapacitated person may have sufficient capacity to make a will, it follows that he or she may likewise have sufficient capacity to direct a change in his or her life insurance beneficiary designation; both are testamentary decisions that take effect at death. Minn. Life Ins. Co. v. Brown, 97 Va. Cir. 68, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 204 (Norfolk 2012).

Conservator’s recovery. —

Specific harm to the estate caused by the prior conservator’s defalcation amounted to costs incurred in taking over the estate and performing the past due duties, and thus the bond secured by the prior conservator was liable for such costs, and the successor conservator was entitled to seek recovery directly from the insurer as the process of first billing the estate was inefficient. In re Estate of Bone, 91 Va. Cir. 547, 2014 Va. Cir. LEXIS 157 (Chesapeake Nov. 21, 2014).

§ 64.2-2023.
Estate planning.

In the order appointing a conservator entered pursuant to §

64.2-2009

or in a separate proceeding brought on petition, the court may for good cause shown authorize a conservator to (i) make gifts from income and principal of the incapacitated person’s estate not necessary for the incapacitated person’s maintenance to those persons to whom the incapacitated person would, in the judgment of the court, have made gifts if he had been of sound mind, (ii) disclaim property as provided in Chapter 26 (§

64.2-2600

et seq.), or (iii) create a revocable or irrevocable trust on behalf of an incapacitated person with terms approved by the court or transfer assets of an incapacitated person or an incapacitated person’s estate to a trust.

In a proceeding under this section, a guardian ad litem shall be appointed to represent the interest of the incapacitated person. Notice of a proceeding under this section shall be given pursuant to Chapter 8 (§

8.01-285

et seq.) of Title 8.01 and the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia to: (i) the incapacitated person and the incapacitated person’s spouse and children, (ii) all beneficiaries named in any known will of the incapacitated person, (iii) the incapacitated person’s intestate heirs determined as if the incapacitated person had died intestate on the date of the filing of the petition, and (iv) all other interested persons. The court may authorize the hearing to proceed without notice to any person who would not be substantially affected by the proceedings. For the purposes of this section, the beneficiaries and intestate heirs shall be deemed possessed of inchoate property rights. Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may with the approval of the court be represented and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the will proceeding under this section, but only to the extent that there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

The court shall determine the amounts, recipients, and proportions of any gifts of the estate, the advisability of any disclaimer, whether good cause exists to create a trust or transfer assets, and whether to approve the trust terms after considering (i) the size and composition of the estate; (ii) the nature and probable duration of the incapacity; (iii) the effect of the gifts, disclaimers, trusts, or transfers on the estate’s financial ability to meet the incapacitated person’s foreseeable health, medical care, and maintenance needs; (iv) the incapacitated person’s estate plan and the effect of the gifts, disclaimers, trusts, or transfers on the estate plan; (v) prior patterns of assistance or gifts to the proposed donees; (vi) the tax effect of the proposed gifts, disclaimers, trusts, or transfers; (vii) the effect of any transfer of assets or disclaimer on the establishment or retention of eligibility for medical assistance services; (viii) whether to require, during the lifetime of the incapacitated person, that the trustee of any trust created or funded pursuant to this section post bond, with or without surety, or provide an accounting as set forth in §

64.2-1305

; and (ix) other factors that the court may deem relevant.

A commissioner of accounts for the jurisdiction where a conservator qualifies may authorize the same gifts under the same circumstances as the circuit court may authorize under subsection C, except that (i) the total gifts authorized in a calendar year shall not exceed $25,000 and (ii) the commissioner shall report to the court his determination based upon consideration of clauses (i) through (ix) set forth in subsection C. The provisions of subsection B shall not apply to proceedings before the commissioner, but the commissioner shall give reasonable written notice of the scheduled hearing date to any person who would be substantially affected by the proceedings. The commissioner may provide notice to a minor by mail to the duly qualified guardian of the minor or, if none exists, a custodial parent of the minor who is also not the conservator.

If the gifts by the conservator under clause (i) of subsection A do not exceed $150 to each donee in a calendar year and do not exceed a total of $750 in a calendar year, the conservator may make such gifts without a hearing under this section, the appointment of a guardian ad litem, or giving notice to any person. Prior to the making of such a gift, the conservator shall consider clauses (i) through (ix) set forth in subsection C and shall also find that the incapacitated person has shown a history of giving the same or a similar gift to a specific donee for the previous three years prior to the appointment of the conservator.

The conservator may transfer assets of an incapacitated person or an incapacitated person’s estate into an irrevocable trust where the transfer has been designated solely for burial of the incapacitated person or spouse of the incapacitated person in accordance with conditions set forth in subdivision A 2 of §

32.1-325

. The conservator also may contractually bind an incapacitated person or an incapacitated person’s estate by executing a preneed funeral contract, described in Chapter 28 (§

54.1-2800

et seq.) of Title 54.1, for the benefit of the incapacitated person.

A conservator may exercise the incapacitated person’s power to revoke or amend a trust or to withdraw or demand distribution of trust assets only with the approval of the court for good cause shown, unless the trust instrument expressly provides otherwise.

History.

1997, c. 921, § 37.1-137.5; 2003, cc. 253, 528; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1024; 2012, c. 614; 2013, c. 523; 2014, c. 532.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 523 rewrote subsections A and B, added the subsection C designator and redesignated former subsections C and D as subsections E and F.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532 added subsection D and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection E substituted “$150” for “$100” and “$750” for “$500.”

§ 64.2-2024.
Fiduciary to take possession of incapacitated person’s estate; suits relative to estate; retaining estate for fiduciary’s own debt.

Subject to any conditions or limitations set forth in the order appointing him, the fiduciary shall take possession of the incapacitated person’s estate and may sue and be sued in respect to all claims or demands of every nature in favor of or against the incapacitated person and the incapacitated person’s estate. The fiduciary shall have the same right of retaining for his own debt as an administrator would have.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-147; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-139; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1025; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2025.
Fiduciary to prosecute and defend actions involving incapacitated person.

Subject to any conditions or limitations set forth in the order appointing the fiduciary, the fiduciary shall prosecute or defend all actions or suits to which the incapacitated person is a party at the time of qualification of the fiduciary and all such actions or suits subsequently instituted after 10 days’ notice of the pendency of the action or suit. Such notice shall be given by the clerk of the court in which the action or suit is pending.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-149; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-141; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1026; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 Parties. § 5.01 Introduction. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 1-105 Style and Commencement of Action by Guardian of Infant, et seq.; No.

1-207

Complaint — Negligence of Physician; No. 6-703 Petition for Appointment of Guardian and Conservator, et seq.

§ 64.2-2026.
Surrender of incapacitated person’s estate.

If the incapacitated person is restored to capacity, the fiduciary shall surrender the incapacitated person’s estate or that portion for which he is accountable to the incapacitated person.

If the incapacitated person dies prior to being restored to capacity, the fiduciary shall surrender the real estate to the incapacitated person’s heirs or devisees and the personal estate to his executors or administrators. If, at the time of the death of the incapacitated person, (i) the value of the personal estate in the custody of the fiduciary is $25,000 or less, (ii) a personal representative has not qualified within 60 days of the incapacitated person’s death, and (iii) the fiduciary does not anticipate that anyone will qualify, the fiduciary may pay the balance of the incapacitated person’s estate to the incapacitated person’s surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, to the distributees of the incapacitated person or other persons entitled thereto, including any person or entity entitled to payment for funeral or burial services provided. The distribution shall be noted in the fiduciary’s final accounting submitted to the commissioner of accounts.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-151; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-144; 1995, c. 344; 1997, c. 921; 2003, c. 195; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1027; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532, in subsection B, substituted “$25,000” for “$15,000.”

§ 64.2-2027.
Use of estate of incapacitated person in a state facility not limited by provisions relating to expenses.

Nothing in Article 2 (§

37.2-715

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 37.2 shall be construed to relieve the fiduciary of any individual receiving services in a state facility from paying to the state facility a sum for extra comforts or to make it unlawful for the fiduciary to make voluntary gifts that the fiduciary may deem conducive to the happiness and comfort of the individual.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-153; 1950, p. 924; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-146; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1028; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 614.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 476 and 507 amended former § 37.2-1028, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 4, the 2012 amendments by Acts 2012, cc. 476 and 507 have been given effect in this section by substituting “individual receiving services” for “consumer” once and “individual” for “consumer” at the end.

§ 64.2-2028.
Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services to be notified in certain cases.

In any suit or action for the appointment of a fiduciary who is to have the management and control of funds belonging to any person who has been admitted to any state facility, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall receive notice of the suit or action, and the clerk of any court in which the suit or action is pending shall notify the Commissioner of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services of that fact.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-153.1; 1950, p. 924; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-147; 2005, c. 716, § 37.2-1029; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2029.
Application to guardians and conservators appointed pursuant to § 64.2-2115.

Except as otherwise provided in an order entered pursuant to §

64.2-2115

, a guardian or conservator appointed pursuant to §

64.2-2115

shall be subject to the provisions of §§

64.2-2011

and

64.2-2012

and this article.

History.

2011, c. 518, § 37.2-1030; 2012, c. 614.